Vermont, session 2025-2026, H795.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 85 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 85. FOOD AND LODGING ESTABLISHMENTS
Subchapter 1. Food and Lodging Establishments Generally
§ 4301. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this chapter:
* * *
(2) “Children’s camp” means any day or residential camp for children
that:
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 2 of 12
(A) offers a combination of programs and facilities established for
the primary purpose of providing an experience to children; and
(B) is operated for five or more consecutive days during one or more
seasons of the year; and
(C) provides 24-hours-a-day supervision of children.
* * *
Subchapter 3. Children’s Camps
§ 4371. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Cabin” means a structure used to provide temporary sleeping
quarters for campers.
(2) “Camper” means a youth under 18 years of age who is attending a
children’s camp on a day or residential basis.
(3) “Flood hazard area” has the same meaning as area of special flood
hazard under 44 C.F.R. § 59.1.
(4) “Health and Safety Team” means the Children’s Camp Health and
Safety Team established in section 4372 of this chapter.
(5) “Mapped river corridor” means a river corridor drawn and adopted
by the Secretary of Natural Resources as part of the statewide River Corridor
Base Map Layer in accordance with the Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 3 of 12
Protection Procedure for rivers and streams with a watershed area greater than
two square miles.
(6) “Regional emergency management committee” means a local
organization for emergency management in accordance with the State
emergency management plan and program as described in 20 V.S.A. § 6.
§ 4372. CHILDREN’S CAMP HEALTH AND SAFETY TEAM
(a) Creation. There is established the Children’s Camp Health and Safety
Team within the Department of Health for the purposes of recommending
minimum health and safety standards for children’s camps to the
Commissioner of Health and the General Assembly and reviewing and
approving children’s camps’ emergency plans.
(b) Membership. The Health and Safety Team shall be composed of:
(1) a representative of the Department of Health, appointed by the
Commissioner;
(2) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
(3) the Commissioner of Financial Regulation or designee; and
(4) the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation or designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Health and Safety Team shall convene not less
than quarterly to:
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 4 of 12
(1) develop and recommend health and safety policies for children’s
camps, including recommendations that may require amendment to State law
or rule; and
(2) review and approve emergency plans submitted by children’s camps
in the State.
(d) Assistance. The Health and Safety Team shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Department of Health.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The member appointed by the Commissioner of Health shall serve as
chair.
(2) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
§ 4373. ADDITIONAL LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS
(a) In addition to the requirements in subchapters 1 and 2 of this chapter, a
children’s camp shall meet the following health and safety requirements to
obtain a license to operate under this chapter:
(1) develop and adopt an approved emergency plan pursuant to section
4374 of this chapter;
(2) maintain an operable radio capable of providing real-time weather
alerts issued by the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather
service at the children’s camp;
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 5 of 12
(3) install and maintain at the children’s camp an emergency warning
system that:
(A) is capable of alerting all campers and camp occupants of an
emergency; and
(B) includes a public address system that is operable without reliance
on an internet connection;
(4) monitor safety alerts issued by:
(A) the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather
service; and
(B) if applicable to the children’s camp, local river authorities or
through other local emergency notification systems;
(5) conspicuously post the proper evacuation route, as described in the
approved emergency plan required pursuant to section 4374 of this chapter, in
each cabin on the premises of the children’s camp;
(6) ensure each evacuation route on the premises of the children’s camp
is illuminated at night; and
(7) provide and maintain on the premises of the children’s camp:
(A) fiber-optic internet service; and
(B) a secondary broadband internet service that is distinct from the
fiber-optic internet service required under subdivision (A) of this subdivision
(7).
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 6 of 12
(b) The Department may suspend any children’s camp license if it finds
that the children’s camp is not in compliance with this chapter. It may
reinstate a suspended license only after the Department determines the
children’s camp has come into compliance with the chapter.
§ 4374. EMERGENCY PLAN
(a) A children’s camp shall develop and implement an emergency plan
that:
(1) specifies muster zones for campers and camp staff to gather during
an emergency event that requires evacuation from any location within the
children’s camp premises;
(2) establishes procedures for responding to an emergency event,
including:
(A) a lost camper;
(B) a fire on the children’s camp premises;
(C) a severe injury, severe illness, serious accident, or death of one or
more campers, visitors, camp staff, or camp volunteers that occurs on the
children’s camp premises or while under the supervision of camp staff;
(D) an aquatic emergency if the children’s camp borders a
watercourse, lake, pond, or any other body of water;
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 7 of 12
(E) an epidemic;
(F) an unauthorized or unknown individual present on the children’s
camp premises;
(G) a transportation emergency; or
(H) any other natural disaster or emergency event required by rule;
(3) establishes a procedure to identify and account for each camper
affected by an emergency event;
(4) establishes procedures to notify and communicate with:
(A) local emergency management services, including the regional
emergency management committee operating in the region in which the
children’s camp is located;
(B) the children’s camp administrative and medical services staff;
and
(C) the parents and legal guardians of each camper affected by an
emergency event; and
(5) designates an emergency preparedness coordinator on the premises
of the children’s camp.
(b) A children’s camp may consult with the regional emergency
management committee operating in the region in which the children’s camp is
located in developing its emergency plan.
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 8 of 12
(c)(1) Annually, at least four months prior to the children’s camp opening
for the season, the children’s camp shall submit a copy of its proposed
emergency plan developed pursuant to this section to the Health and Safety
Team for review and approval. The proposed emergency plan shall be
submitted in a form and manner prescribed by the Health and Safety Team.
(2)(A) If the Health and Safety Team determines that a children’s
camp’s proposed emergency plan does meet the minimum standards prescribed
in this chapter and in rule, the Health and Safety Team shall approve the
emergency plan. A children’s camp shall include its approved emergency plan
as an addendum to each application for licensure or licensure renewal.
(B) If the Health and Safety Team determines that the children’s
camp’s proposed emergency plan does not meet the minimum standards
prescribed in this chapter and in rule, the Health and Safety Team shall advise
the children’s camp to revise and resubmit the proposed emergency plan within
30 days after receiving notice from the Health and Safety Team of the
proposed emergency plan’s deficiencies.
(d) Annually, a children’s camp shall provide a copy of its most recently
approved emergency plan to:
(1) the regional emergency management committee operating in the
region in which the children’s camp is located;
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 9 of 12
(2) the parent or legal guardian of each camper; and
(3) camp staff and any volunteers.
(e)(1) The Department shall store in a digital database each approved
emergency plan submitted by a licensed children’s camp and shall provide
access to the database to the Department of Public Safety’s Division of
Emergency Management and members of the Health and Safety Team.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, any approved
emergency plan stored in the Department’s digital database shall be exempt
from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be
kept confidential, provided that an approved emergency plan that is no longer
current shall be available for public inspection and copying 10 years after the
date on which the plan was adopted.
(f)(1) A children’s camp shall notify the Health and Safety Team in the
form and manner prescribed by the Team if the children’s camp modifies a
structure intended to facilitate children’s camp activities or the location of a
camp activity on the premises of the children’s camp.
(2) Upon receiving the notification, the Health and Safety Team may
require the children’s camp to update its emergency plan and resubmit it to the
Health and Safety Team for approval.
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 10 of 12
§ 4375. FLOOD HAZARD AREAS; PARENTAL NOTIFICATION
If any area of a children’s camp is located within a flood hazard area or
mapped river corridor, the children’s camp shall notify the parent or legal
guardian of each current and prospective camper in writing. The children’s
camp shall obtain a written statement acknowledging receipt of this notice
from each camper’s parent or guardian prior to the start of the camper’s
attendance at the children’s camp.
§ 4376. TRAINING AND SAFETY ORIENTATION
(a) Each year prior to the arrival of campers, a children’s camp shall:
(1) ensure each staff member and volunteer successfully completes a
training on the children’s camp’s approved emergency plan in compliance with
any minimum standards required by the Department by rule;
(2) instruct each staff member and volunteer on the proper procedures to
follow in an emergency event under the approved emergency plan; and
(3) maintain written records documenting each staff member’s and
volunteer’s participation in and successful completion of the training required
pursuant to this subsection.
(b) Within the first 48 hours of the start of any children’s camp session, a
camp staff member shall conduct a mandatory health and safety orientation
that:
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 11 of 12
(1) notifies each camper of the children’s camp’s boundaries and any
hazards present on the camp premises;
(2) instructs each camper on behavioral expectations in an emergency
event; and
(3) provides each camper with developmentally appropriate instruction
on the procedures to follow in an emergency event in accordance with the
children’s camp approved emergency plan required under section 4374 of this
chapter.
§ 4377. COMPLAINT AND INSPECTION PROCESS
(a)(1) The Department shall maintain on its website a publicly accessible
complaint page for use by any individual, including a camper, parent or legal
guardian, camp staff member, or volunteer, who wishes to report that a
children’s camp is noncompliant with this chapter.
(2) Each licensed children’s camp shall maintain a link to the
Department’s complaint page in a prominent location on its website.
(b) The Department shall investigate each complaint filed with the
Department using the publicly accessible web page or by other means to
ensure a children’s camp is properly implementing its approved emergency
plan and other obligations under this chapter. Each investigation shall include
an in-person inspection of the children’s camp in question.
VT LEG #385045 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.795
2026 Page 12 of 12
§ 4378. RULEMAKING
The Department shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
implement the provisions of this subchapter. The rules shall also include
minimum camper-to-counselor ratios for overnight stays at children’s camps.
Subchapter 34. Serving Milk to Public
* * *
Subchapter 45. Bakeries
* * *
Subchapter 56. Salvage Food Facilities
* * *
Subchapter 67. Temporary Outdoor Seating
* * *
Subchapter 78. Short-Term Rentals
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385045 v.2